Washington statutes.
RCW 19.150.050

Form of notice.

A notice in substantially the following form shall satisfy the requirements of RCW 19.150.040:

"PRELIMINARY LIEN NOTICE

to

(occupant)

(address)

(state)

You owe and have not paid rent and/or other charges for the use of storage (space number) at (name and address of self-service storage facility)

Charges that have been due for more than fourteen days and accruing on or before (date) are itemized as follows:

DUE DATE

DESCRIPTION

AMOUNT

TOTAL $_____

IF this sum is not paid in full before (date at least fourteen days from mailing) , your right to use the storage space will terminate, you may be denied, or continue to be denied, access and an owner's lien on any stored property will be imposed. You may pay the sum due and contact the owner at:

(Name)

(Address)

(State)

(Telephone)

(Date)

(Owner's Signature)

"

[ 1988 c 240 s 6.]